Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law

47-20-80.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.”

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 2.

47-20-81.
Fund defined; applicability.

As used in this article, the term “fund” means the investment fund of any public retirement system or pension system supported wholly or partially from public funds. Such term shall include any pool of such funds for investment purposes.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to political subdivisions which contract with an association of like political subdivisions for the pooling of assets; provided, however, that the provisions of this article shall apply to such association.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 2.

47-20-82.
Investing funds; eligibility; investment limitation.

Funds shall invest in or lend their assets on the security of, and shall hold as invested assets, only eligible investments as prescribed in this article.

Eligibility of an investment shall be determined as of the date of its making or acquisition.

Any investment limitation based upon the amount of the fund’s assets shall relate to such assets on the basis of the assets’ aggregate historical cost. For purposes of any investment made in alternative investments pursuant to Code Section 47-7-127 or 47-20-87, aggregate historical cost shall include all contractually committed, unpaid amounts.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 211, § 2/SB 402.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added the last sentence to subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 211, § 1/SB 402, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia Enhanced Investment Authority Act.’”.

Code Section 47-7-127, referred to in subsection (c), was repealed by Ga. L. 2022, p. 287, § 1, effective May 2, 2022.

47-20-83.
Certificated or uncertificated forms of investment; real estate investments.

Subject to limitations stated in this article, funds may invest in the following in certificated or uncertificated form:

Corporations or obligations of corporations organized under the laws of this state or any other state or under the laws of Canada, but only if the corporation has a market capitalization equivalent to $100 million; provided, however, that except as provided in Code Section 47-20-84, no fund shall invest in corporations or in obligations of corporations organized in a country other than the United States or Canada; provided, further, that such obligation shall be listed as investment grade by a nationally recognized rating agency. For purposes of this paragraph, a corporation organized under the laws of a country other than the United States or Canada shall be deemed to be organized under the laws of this state or another state unless it is a private foreign issuer within the meaning of United States Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 3b-4, 17 C.F.R. Section 240.3b-4, as such appears on July 1, 2007; this will not include any investment with any corporation that is included in the terrorism sanctions issued by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the United States Department of the Treasury pursuant to Executive Order 13224 signed by the President of the United States on September 23, 2001;

Repurchase and reverse repurchase agreements for direct obligations of the United States government and for obligations unconditionally guaranteed by agencies of the United States government and for investments eligible under paragraph (1) of this subsection;

Cash assets or deposits in checking or savings accounts under certificates of deposit or in other form in banks and trust companies and in savings accounts, certificates of deposit, or similar certificates or evidences of deposits in savings and loan associations and building and loan associations which have qualified for the insurance protection afforded by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

Bonds, notes, warrants, and other evidence of indebtedness which are direct obligations of the government of the United States of America or for which the full faith and credit of the government of the United States of America is pledged for the payment of principal and interest;

Loans guaranteed as to principal and interest by the government of the United States of America, or by any agency or instrumentality of the government of the United States of America, to the extent of such guaranty;

Taxable bonds, notes, warrants, and other securities not in default which are the direct obligations of any state of the United States or of the District of Columbia, or of the government of Canada or any province of Canada, or for which the full faith and credit of such state, district, government, or province has been pledged for the payment of principal and interest;

Bonds, notes, warrants, and other securities not in default which are the direct obligations of the government of any foreign country which the International Monetary Fund lists as an industrialized country and for which the full faith and credit of such government has been pledged for the payment of principal and interest, provided such securities are listed as investment grade by a nationally recognized rating agency;

Bonds, debentures, or other securities issued or insured or guaranteed by any agency, authority, unit, or corporate body created by the government of the United States of America whether or not such obligations are guaranteed by the United States;

Collateralized mortgage obligations that are listed as investment grade by a nationally recognized rating agency;

Obligations issued, assumed, or guaranteed by the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development or the International Financial Corporation;

In addition to those investments eligible under paragraph (1) of this subsection, bonds, debentures, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness issued, assumed, or guaranteed by any solvent institution existing under the laws of the United States of America or of Canada, or any state or province thereof, which are not in default as to principal or interest and which are secured by collateral worth at least 50 percent more than the par value of the entire issue of such obligations, but only if not more than one-third of the total value of the required collateral consists of common stocks;

In addition to those investments eligible under paragraph (1) of this subsection, secured and unsecured obligations of issuers described in paragraph (11) of this subsection other than the obligations described in paragraph (11) of this subsection, bearing interest at a fixed rate, with mandatory principal and interest due at specified times, if the net earnings of the issuing, assuming, or guaranteeing institution available for its fixed charges for a period of five fiscal years next preceding the date of acquisition by the fund have averaged per year not less than one and one-half times its average annual fixed charges applicable to such period and if during either of the last two years of the period of such net earnings have been not less than one and one-half times its fixed charges for the year; provided, however, that any such obligation shall be listed as investment grade by a nationally recognized rating agency;

In addition to those investments eligible under paragraph (1) of this subsection, equipment trust obligations or certificates adequately secured and evidencing an interest in transportation equipment, wholly or in part within the United States of America, and the right to receive determinated portions of rental, purchase, or other fixed obligatory payments for the use or purchase of the transportation equipment;

Loans that are secured by pledge or securities eligible for investment under this article;

Purchase money mortgages or like securities received upon the sale or exchange of real property acquired;

In addition to those investments eligible under paragraph (1) of this subsection, a mortgage or a mortgage participation, pass-through, conventional pass-through, trust certificate, or other similar security which represents an undivided, beneficial interest in a pool of loans secured by first mortgages, deeds of trust, or deeds to secure debt upon fee simple, unencumbered, improved, or income-producing real property located in the United States or Canada, which is improved with a residential building or condominium unit or buildings designed for occupancy by not more than four families, including leasehold estates in such real estate if such first mortgages, deeds of trust, or deeds to secure debt are fully guaranteed or insured by the Federal Housing Administration, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the Farmers Home Administration, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal National Mortgage Association, or any similar governmental entity or instrumentality;

Land and buildings on such land used or acquired for use as a fund’s office for the convenient transaction of its own business; provided, however, that portions of such buildings not used for its own business may be rented by the fund to others; provided, further, that the amount invested by a fund in office property shall not exceed 10 percent of the retirement system assets;

Real property acquired in satisfaction in whole or in part of loans, mortgages, liens, judgments, decrees, or debts previously owing to the fund in the course of its business;

Real property acquired in part payment of the consideration on the sale of other real property owned by the fund if such transaction effects a net reduction in the fund’s investment in real estate;

Real property acquired by gift or devise, or through merger or consolidation with another fund;

Additional real property and equipment incident to real property if necessary or convenient for the enhancement of the marketability or sale value of real property previously acquired or held by the fund under paragraphs (18), (19), and (20) of this subsection;

Business entities organized under the laws of this state or any other state or under the laws of Canada, but only if the business entity has a minimum market capitalization equivalent to $100 million and if the business entity has elected to be taxed and continues to qualify as a real estate investment trust under Section 856 through Section 860 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. Section 856 through Section 860; provided, however, that except as provided in Code Section 47-20-84, no fund shall invest in business entities organized in a country other than the United States or Canada;

Shares of mutual funds registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended; and

Commingled funds and collective investment funds maintained by state chartered banks or trust companies or regulated by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States Department of the Treasury, including common and group trusts, and, to the extent the funds are invested in such collective investment funds, the funds shall adopt the terms of the instruments establishing any group trust in accordance with applicable United States Internal Revenue Service Revenue Rulings.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System and any association of like political subdivisions which contracts with its members for the pooling of assets may invest up to 10 percent of the total assets of its fund in real estate; provided, however, that in the event the fund’s assets decrease in value, the association shall be entitled to retain all real estate investments if owned prior to the reduction in value of assets; and provided, further, that any such association shall be entitled to retain all real estate assets it owned on July 1, 1999, without regard to the limitation imposed by this subsection.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, the Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund may invest up to 10 percent of the total assets of its fund in real estate; provided, however, that in the event the fund’s assets decrease in value, the fund shall be entitled to retain all real estate investments if owned prior to the reduction in value of assets.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 115, §§ 1, 2/HB 318; Ga. L. 2009, p. 368, § 1/SB 48; Ga. L. 2013, p. 612, § 1/HB 71; Ga. L. 2015, p. 887, § 1/HB 217; Ga. L. 2016, p. 268, § 1/SB 335; Ga. L. 2017, p. 143, § 1/HB 83.

The 2009 amendment,

effective April 30, 2009, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct this title, revised punctuation in paragraph (a)(1).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “10 percent” for “5 percent” near the middle of subsection (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(21), substituted a semicolon for the period at the end of paragraph (a)(22), and added paragraphs (a)(23) and (a)(24).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, inserted “maintained by state chartered banks or trust companies” near the beginning of paragraph (a)(24).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, designated the existing provisions of subsection (b) as paragraph (b)(1); inserted “and” preceding “provided, further” near the middle of paragraph (b)(1); and added paragraph (b)(2).

47-20-83.1.
[Repealed] Definitions; identification of scrutinized companies where public funds held; Scrutinized Companies with Activities in the Iran Petroleum Energy Sector List; reporting.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-83.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1022, § 3/SB 451; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1022, § 3.1/SB 451, effective July 1, 2015.

47-20-84.
Large retirement systems.

As used in this Code section, the term “large retirement system” means:

Any retirement system created by this title which has an accumulated unfunded actuarial accrued liability not greater than 25 percent of the total of its assets;

The Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System created by Chapter 5 of this title;

Any association of like political subdivisions which, on, before, or after July 1, 1999, contracts with its members for the pooling of assets;

Any public retirement system other than a retirement system defined in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection which meets the following criteria:

The retirement system has:

An accumulated unfunded actuarial liability not greater than 25 percent of the total of its assets; or

Assets in excess of $50 million and an accumulated unfunded actuarial liability not greater than 30 percent of the total of its assets;

The retirement system provides a defined benefit plan;

The retirement system investments are managed by one or more independent professional investment managers recognized by the National Association of Securities Dealers and the United States Securities and Exchange Commission and which adhere to the code of ethical standards and conduct of the Association for Investment Management and Research; and

The retirement system investments are limited to those equities of investment grade quality or better, provided that leverage techniques, option techniques, futures, commodities, private placements, and direct participation plans may not be used in making equity investments; and

Any public retirement system which has more than $200 million in assets.

A large retirement system may invest in corporations or in obligations of corporations organized in a country other than the United States or Canada subject to the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-83.

A fund shall not invest more than 55 percent of retirement system assets in equities; provided, however, that prior to July 1, 2010, a large retirement system shall invest not more than 65 percent of its assets in equities; on and after July 1, 2010, a large retirement system shall invest not more than 70 percent of its assets in equities; and on and after July 1, 2011, a large retirement system shall invest not more than 75 percent of its assets in equities; provided, further, that no fund shall increase its assets in equities through purchase by more than 20 percent in any fiscal year. Any fund which is not in compliance with the limitations imposed by this subsection shall be granted a two-year period to come into compliance; provided, however, that during such two-year period, the fund shall not increase the percentage of its assets invested in equities.

Subject to all other limitations in this chapter, a large retirement system may invest in securities issued by a unit investment trust or an open-end company:

That is listed on a securities exchange;

The assets of which consist of securities managed so that the fund replicates a listed index or specific market sector;

In which continuous markets are quoted by market makers in the applicable unit investment trust or open-end company; and

That has the capability of creating or redeeming shares as necessary to reflect demand.

A large retirement system may enter into contracts, agreements, and other instruments designed to manage risk exposure.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 500, § 1/HB 319; Ga. L. 2007, p. 115, §§ 3, 4/HB 318; Ga. L. 2009, p. 130, § 1/HB 371.

The 2009 amendment,

effective April 21, 2009, in subsection (a), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(3), rewrote subparagraph (a)(4)(A), added “and” at the end of subparagraph (a)(4)(C), deleted subparagraph (a)(4)(E), which read: “Has an accumulated unfunded actuarial liability not greater than 25 percent of the total of its assets”, and added paragraph (a)(5); in subsection (b), substituted “may invest” for “may not invest more than 15 percent of the retirement system assets” near the beginning; in the first sentence of subsection (c), inserted “prior to July 1, 2010,”, substituted “65 percent” for “60 percent”, and added “; on and after July 1, 2010, a large retirement system shall invest not more than 70 percent of its assets in equities; and on and after July 1, 2011, a large retirement system shall invest not more than 75 percent of its assets in equities; provided, further, that no fund shall increase its assets in equities through purchase by more than 20 percent in any fiscal year”; deleted former subsection (d), which read: “In the event the value of a fund’s assets decreases so as to render such fund ineligible to invest in foreign equities as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section and to invest in excess of 55 percent of its assets in total equities as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, such fund shall have 12 months from the date of such event to come into compliance with the investment authority provided by this article; provided, however, that during such period such fund shall not increase its holdings in foreign equities and shall not increase its total holdings in equities.”; and redesignated former subsections (e) and (f) as present subsections (d) and (e), respectively.

47-20-85.
Compliance.

Notwithstanding any provision of the federal Secondary Mortgage Market Enhancement Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 77r-1, to the contrary, any fund subject to the provisions of this article shall comply with all provisions, restrictions, and limitations concerning investments provided in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 2.

47-20-86.
Enforcement.

This article shall be enforced as provided in Article 3 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-86

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 2.

47-20-87.
Definitions; eligible large retirement systems authorized to invest in certain alternative investments; applicability.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Alternative investments” means the following investments:

Privately placed investment pools, including, without limitation, private investment funds, such as:

Leveraged buyout funds;

Mezzanine funds;

Workout funds;

Debt funds;

Venture capital funds;

Merchant banking funds; and

Funds of funds and secondary funds

that include investments in privately placed investment pools described in this subparagraph, in each case whether structured as a partnership, limited liability company, trust, corporation, joint venture, or other entity or investment vehicle of any type; organized or operating in one of the states or territories of the United States or outside the United States; such pool will invest in the United States or outside the United States or any combination thereof; or such pool makes investments of the type described in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph or other investments of any type or any combination thereof;

Private placements and other private investments, including without limitation:

Leveraged buyouts;

Venture capital investment;

Equity investments, including, without limitation, preferred and common stock;

Warrants;

Options;

Private investments in public securities;

Recapitalizations;

Privatizations;

Mezzanine debt investments;

Distressed debt and equity investments, including, without limitation, cases in which the investor may take control of the issuer;

Other debt investments, whether secured or unsecured, senior or subordinated, recourse or nonrecourse, convertible, or otherwise;

Convertible securities;

Receivables;

Interests, as such term is referred to in 11 U.S.C. Sections 501 and 502;

Claims, as such term is defined in 11 U.S.C. Section 101(5);

Debt and equity derivative instruments of all types; and

All other debt and equity private placements of all types, in each case whether issued by a partnership, limited liability company, trust, corporation, joint venture, or other entity or vehicle of any type or whether the issuer is organized or does business in one of the states or territories of the United States or outside the United States; and

Any distribution in kind received by an eligible large retirement system in connection with any investment described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph.

“Eligible large retirement system” means a large retirement system as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-84.

In addition to the eligible investments authorized by Code Section 47-20-82, and without applicability of any restrictions set forth in Code Sections 47-20-83 and 47-20-84, an eligible large retirement system is authorized to invest in alternative investments in accordance with the provisions of this Code section. Further, when provisions of Code Section 47-20-83 or 47-20-84 or any provisions of this article other than this Code section limit a particular form of investment to a certain percentage of retirement system assets, the denominator will include alternative investments with all other investments, but the numerator for any such calculation shall not include any alternative investments, even if any such alternative investment is of a like kind as the investments that are included in the numerator.

An alternative investment shall not exceed in any case 20 percent of the aggregate amount of:

The capital to be invested in the applicable private pool, including all parallel pools and other related investment vehicles established as part of the investment program of the applicable private pool; and

The securities being issued in the applicable private placement, in each case determined at the time such alternative investment is initially either made or committed to be made, as applicable, but taking into consideration any investments that have previously been or are concurrently being made or committed to be made.

Each alternative investment by an eligible large retirement system shall have previously been or shall be concurrently made or committed to be made by at least four other investors not affiliated with the issuer. At the time of initial investment, such investors shall not include any trustee of the eligible large retirement system making the investment or any public official as defined in paragraph (9) of Code Section 45-10-20. Such four other investors shall be investing on substantially the same terms and conditions as those applicable to the investment by the eligible large retirement system to the extent such other investors are similarly situated with the eligible large retirement system. Alternative investments shall only be made in private pools and issuers that have at least $100 million in assets, including committed capital, at the time the investment is initially made or committed to be made by an eligible large retirement system.

Alternative investments by an eligible large retirement system shall not in the aggregate exceed 10 percent of the eligible large retirement system’s assets at any time.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, alternative investments by the Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund shall not in the aggregate exceed 15 percent of its assets at any time.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the Teachers’ Retirement System of Georgia shall not in the aggregate exceed 5 percent of such system’s assets at any time.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall not in the aggregate exceed 5 percent of such system’s assets at any time.

The board of trustees of an eligible large retirement system shall have the discretion to designate whether any investment that is permitted to be made as an alternative investment pursuant to this Code section that is also permitted to be made as an investment pursuant to Code Section 47-20-83 shall be treated as an alternative investment made pursuant to this Code section and subject to and included within the percentage limitations provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection or as an investment made pursuant to Code Section 47-20-83.

If an eligible large retirement system is not in compliance with the limitations imposed by this subsection, it shall make a good faith effort to come into compliance within two years and in any event as soon as practicable thereafter; provided, however, that during any period of noncompliance, the eligible large retirement system shall not increase the percentage of its assets committed to be invested in alternative investments but shall be permitted during such period to continue to make investments as required by the then existing commitments of the eligible large retirement system to alternative investments made before the period of noncompliance.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. New commitments to alternative investments shall not in the aggregate exceed 1 percent of the retirement system assets in any calendar year until the first occurrence that 4 1/2 percent of the retirement system assets are invested in alternative investments, at which time there shall be no limit on the percentage of commitments that may be made in any calendar year, subject to compliance with the other provisions of this Code section.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “information” shall include, without limitation, preinvestment and postinvestment diligence information, including reviews and analyses prepared or provided by the issuer of a potential or actual alternative investment or prepared by or for an eligible large retirement system or otherwise relating to a potential or actual alternative investment.

In addition to those records that are exempted from being open to inspection by the general public under Code Section 47-1-14 and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an eligible large retirement system may in its discretion treat as confidential and withhold from public inspection and disclosure all information prepared or provided by the issuer of a potential or actual alternative investment or prepared by or for an eligible large retirement system or otherwise relating to a potential or actual alternative investment and held by an eligible large retirement system and may agree in making an alternative investment to treat such information as confidential and withhold it from public inspection and disclosure.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, any public retirement system created by this title, other than by Chapter 5 of this title, shall make publicly available the following information, but only to the extent the following information is otherwise available or maintained by said retirement system in the normal course and only after a period of one year from the date such records were created:

The name of any alternative investment in which the retirement system has invested; excluding, in the case of an alternative investment in a privately placed investment pool, any information concerning the investments made by such privately placed investment pool;

The date the retirement system first invested in an alternative investment;

The aggregate amount of money, expressed in dollars, the retirement system has invested in alternative investments as of the end of any fiscal quarter;

The aggregate amount of money and the value of any in kind or other distribution, in each case, expressed in dollars, the retirement system received from alternative investments;

The internal rate of return or the result under any other such standard used by the retirement system in connection with alternative investments for the asset class and for the period for which the return or standard was calculated; and

The remaining cost of alternative investments in which the retirement system has invested as of the end of any fiscal quarter.

The provisions of this Code section shall not restrict access to information and records under process of law or by officers otherwise entitled to them for official purposes, but such information and records shall have the same confidential status under process or with such officers as it does in the hands of an eligible large retirement system, and such officers shall respect such confidentiality to the extent consistent with their separate powers and duties.

On the second Monday in March of each year, the director of any public retirement system created by this title, other than by Chapter 5 of this title, shall provide a report to the Governor and the chairpersons of the House and Senate standing committees on retirement detailing the performance of any investments made pursuant to this Code section, including, without limitation, a clear statement of the aggregate loss or profit on such investments for the preceding year. Such report shall also be posted on the retirement system’s official website. This paragraph shall not be construed so as to require the disclosure of any information otherwise protected by this subsection.

Unless the information has been publicly released, preinvestment and postinvestment diligence information, including reviews and analyses, prepared or maintained by the eligible large retirement system or by an alternative investment firm shall be confidential and exempted from being open to inspection by the general public pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, except to the extent it is subject to disclosure from the requirements of subsection (f) of this Code section.

The respective boards of trustees of eligible large retirement systems making investments authorized by this Code section shall adopt a code of ethics for the consideration of and investment in and disposition of alternative investments.

Funds invested pursuant to this Code section and any return on such investment shall remain funds of the retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-87

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 211, § 3/SB 402; Ga. L. 2017, p. 143, § 2/HB 83; Ga. L. 2020, p. 514, § 1/SB 294; Ga. L. 2021, p. 655, § 2/HB 173; Ga. L. 2022, p. 287, § 2/HB 1056.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (d), added the paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) and subparagraph (d)(1)(A) designations; substituted “system’s assets” for “system assets” near the end of subparagraph (d)(1)(A); added subparagraph (d)(1)(B); inserted “or 10 percent” in the middle of present paragraph (d)(2); and substituted “an eligible” for “the eligible” at the beginning of present paragraph (d)(3).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, deleted “; provided, however, that such term shall not include the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia” following “Code Section 47-20-87” at the end of paragraph (a)(2).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “10 percent” for “5 percent” in subparagraph (d)(1)(A); and added subparagraphs (d)(1)(C) and (d)(1)(D).

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, substituted “15 percent” for “10 percent” near the end of subparagraph (d)(1)(B), and in paragraph (d)(2), deleted “and” following “this Code section”, deleted “for purposes of the 5 percent or 10 percent limitation and otherwise” following “shall be treated”, and inserted “and subject to and included within the percentage limitations provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 211, § 1/SB 402, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia Enhanced Investment Authority Act.’”